Utah statutes.
72-11-113.   Refunding of bonds authorized.

Subject to the approval of the director of the Division of Finance, the committee is authorized to refund any revenue bonds that may become due or that may be called with the consent of the holder or holders whenever refunding may be considered necessary or desirable.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

